de: Motorradreifentyp: Abenteuer; Cruiser; Schmutz; Enduro; Rennen; Scooter; Sport; Touring; Sonstiges
en: Motorcycle tire type: Adventure; Cruiser; Dirt; Dual sport; Racing; Scooter; Sport; Touring; Other
vi: Loại lốp xe gắn máy: Phiêu lưu; Lốp không gấp; Lốp địa hình; Lốp thể thao kép; Lốp đua; Xe tay ga; Sport; Lốp đi phượt; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de pneu de motociclo: Aventura; Cruiser; De terra; Dual sport; Corridas; Scooter; Desporto; Passeio; Outro
hu: Motorkerékpár gumiabroncstípusa: Kaland; Cruiser; Terep; Dual sport; Verseny; Robogó; Sport; Túra; Egyéb
nb: Dekktype for motorsykkel: Eventyr; Cruiser; Jord; Dobbelsport; Racing; Scooter; Sport; Tur; Annet
sv: Typ av motorcykeldäck: Äventyr; Kryssare; Smuts; Dubbel sport; Racing; Skoter; Sport; Touring; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип гума за мотоциклет: Приключение; Всъдеход; Мръсотия; Dual sport; Състезания; Скутер; Спорт; Туринг; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta guma za motocikl: Avanturističke; Cruiser; Terenske; Dual-sport; Trkaće; Skuter; Sportske; Touring; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta pnevmatike za motorno kolo: Pustolovščina; Križarsko; Motokros; Terensko in cestno; Dirkalna; Skuter; Šport; Turing; Drugo
ja: バイク用タイヤの種類: アドベンチャー; クルーザー; 泥; デュアルスポーツ; レース; スクーター; スポーツ; ツーリング; その他
sk-SK: Typ motocyklovej pneumatiky: Dobrodružstvo; Krížnik; Špina; Duálny šport; Pretekársky; Kolobežka; Šport; Touring; Iné
pl: Typ opony motocyklowej: Przygodowy; Krążownik; Brud; Podwójny sport; Wyścigi; Skuter; Sport; Na trasy; Inne
fr: Type de pneu de moto: Aventure; Croiseur; Saleté; Double sport; Courses; Scooter; Sport; Tourisme; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul anvelopelor pentru motociclete: Aventură; Cruiser; Noroi; Dual sport; Curse de mașini; Scuter; Sport; Călătorii lungi; Altele
th: ประเภทยางรถจักรยานยนต์: การผจญภัย; ครูสเซอร์; ลุยโคลน; ดูอัลสปอร์ต; สำหรับแข่ง; สกูตเตอร์; กีฬา; ทัวริ่ง; อื่นๆ
nl: Type motorband: Avontuur; Cruiser; Vuil; Dubbele sport; Racen; Scooter; Sport; Toeren; Andere
lt-LT: Motociklo padangų tipas: „Adventure“; Kruizinės; Purvo; „Dual-sport“; Lenktynių; Motorolerio; Sportinės; Turistinės; Kita
zh-TW: 機車輪胎類型: 冒險; 徑向; 越野; 多功能; 賽車; 小型機車; 運動; 旅行; 其他
ru: Тип мотоциклетной шины: Приключения; Круизер; Грязь; Двойного назначения; Гонки; Скутер; Спортивный; Туристический; Другой
tr: Motosiklet lastiği türü: Macera; Cruiser; Arazi; Enduro; Yarış; Mobilet; Spor; Touring; Diğer
da: Motorcykeldæktype: Eventyr; Cruiser; Dirt; Dual sport; Racing; Scooter; Sport; Touring; Andet
fi: Moottoripyörän rengastyyppi: Seikkailu; Cruiser; Muta; Kaksoisurheilu; Kilpailu; Skootteri; Urheilu; Touring; Muu
el: Τύπος ελαστικού μοτοσυκλέτας: Περιπέτειας; Cruiser; Χώματος; Dual sport; Αγωνιστικά; Σκούτερ; Αθλητισμός; Περιήγησης; Άλλο
zh-CN: 摩托车轮胎类型: 冒险; 巡逻警车; 泥地; 两用运动型; 赛车; 小摩托车; 体育; 旅行胎; 其他
ko: 오토바이 타이어 종류: 어드벤처; 순찰차; 흙; 듀얼 스포츠; 레이싱; 스쿠터; 스포츠; 투어링; 기타
it: Tipo di pneumatico del motociclo: Avventura; Cruiser; Sporco; Dual sport; Corsa; Monopattino; Sport; Da viaggio; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de pneu de motocicleta: Aventura; Cruiser; Terra; Dual sport; Corrida; Lambreta; Esporte; Passeio; Outro
es: Tipo de neumáticos para motocicletas: Aventura; Crucero; Tierra; Deportiva doble; Carreras; Patinete; Deportivo; Turismo; Otros
cs: Typ pneumatiky motocyklu: Dobrodružství; Cruiser; Do terénu; Univerzální sportovní; Závodění; Skútr; Sport; Cestovní; Jiné